Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1005.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-24.6-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-24.6 entitled "Lead
Poisoning Prevention Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-24.6-7. Screening by health care providers.
(a) The department shall promulgate regulations establishing the means by which and the
intervals at which children under six (6) years of age shall be screened for lead poisoning. The
department is also authorized to require screening for lead poisoning in other high risk groups.
(b) Each physician registered or licensed by Rhode Island or any agency of Rhode Island
shall screen children under six (6) years of age for lead poisoning at the intervals and using the
methods specified in the regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (a). Each licensed, registered
or approved health care facility serving children under six (6) years of age, including but not limited
to hospitals, clinics, and health maintenance organizations, shall take appropriate steps to ensure
that their patients receive screening for lead poisoning at the intervals and using the methods
specified in these regulations.
(c) All health care programs funded in whole or in part with state money and having child
health components shall include, require, and/or provide for screening children under six (6) years
of age for lead poisoning at the intervals and using the methods specified in the regulations
promulgated under this section.
(d) The provisions of this section shall not apply if the parents of the child object to the
child undergoing blood lead screening on the grounds that the screening conflicts with their

religious tenets and practices.
(e) All blood samples taken by physicians or other health care providers licensed in Rhode
Island or by licensed, registered, or approved health care facilities in Rhode Island from children
under the age of six (6) years for the purpose of screening for blood lead level shall be sent to either
the state laboratory in the department of health or a clinical laboratory, as defined in §23-16.2-2,
that is operated by an entity incorporated in the State of Rhode Island, for laboratory analysis.
(f) The department shall, at least annually, analyze and summarize all of the lead screening
information provided by physicians, health care facilities, and laboratories and provide this
information to all other local and state agencies involved with case management and lead hazard
reduction. An analysis and summary of the data shall also be made available, at least annually, to
the health care community, to the general assembly, and the general public in a format that is easily
understandable to non-technical readers.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002822
========
LC002822 - Page 2 of 3